Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.470

Crimes against children—Mandatory termination of certificated employees—Appeal—Recovery of salary or compensation by district.

The school district shall immediately terminate the employment of any person whose certificate or permit authorized under chapter 28A.405 or 28A.410 RCW is subject to revocation under *RCW 28A.410.090(3) upon a guilty plea or conviction of any felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322. Employment shall remain terminated unless the employee successfully prevails on appeal. A school district board of directors is entitled to recover from the employee any salary or other compensation that may have been paid to the employee for the period between such time as the employee was placed on administrative leave, based upon criminal charges that the employee committed a felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322, and the time termination becomes final. This section shall only apply to employees holding a certificate or permit who have contact with children during the course of their employment.

[ 2009 c 396 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 405; 1989 c 320 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.58.1003.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.410.090 was amended by 2013 c 163 s 1, changing subsection (3) to subsection (4).

Severability—1989 c 320: See note following RCW 28A.410.090.